New York, session 2025-2026, S8885.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (c) and (d) of subdivision 8 of section 310 of 2 the executive law, as added by chapter 261 of the laws of 1988, are 3 amended and a new paragraph (e) is added to read as follows: 4 (c) Native American or Alaskan native persons having origins in any of 5 the original peoples of North America[.]; 6 (d) Asian and Pacific Islander persons having origins in any of the 7 Far East countries, South East Asia, the Indian subcontinent or the 8 Pacific Islands[.]; 9 (e) A person with a disability as defined in subdivision twenty-one of 10 section two hundred ninety-two of this chapter. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 12 the amendments to subdivision 8 of section 310 of the executive law made 13 by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section 14 and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14441-02-6